Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 2
FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION OF
AT-RISK ADULTS

26-3.1-201 to 26-3.1-208. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part repealed, (SB 12-078), ch. 226, p. 998, § 2, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was added in 2000. For amendments to this part 2 prior to its repeal in 2012, consult the 2011 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Some sections of this part 2 were relocated to part 1 of this article. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.